Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.350

False or misleading statements in filed documents.

It is unlawful for any person to make or cause to be made, in any document filed with the director or in any proceeding under this chapter, any statement which is, at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it is made, false or misleading in any material respect.

[ 1959 c 282 s 35.]